Florida, session 2026, HB1019.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Joe Casello Act."
Section 2. Section 376.911, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
376.911 Aqueous film-forming foam.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Aqueous film-forming foam" means any firefighting
foam containing intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances, including perfluorooctanoic acid and
perfluorooctane sulfonate as defined by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency.
(b) "Department" means the Department of Environmental
Protection.
(2) Effective July 1, 2026:
(a) Aqueous film-forming foam may not be used for any
nonemergency instruction, training, or testing.
(b) All entities in possession of aqueous film-forming
foam must report inventories to the department.
(3) Effective July 1, 2027:
(a) The sale, purchase, or distribution of aqueous film-
forming foam within this state is prohibited.
(b) All entities with remaining inventories of aqueous
film-forming foam must submit a disposal plan to the department.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1019 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1019, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
(4) Effective July 1, 2029, possession and use of aqueous
film-forming foam is prohibited in this state.
(5) The prohibition under subsection (4) does not apply
to:
(a) Airports as defined in s. 330.27.
(b) Military applications where alternatives do not exist.
(c) Emergency firefighting situations where alternative
firefighting foam is not available, including mutual aid where
state or local firefighting authorities may not have adequate
equipment to dispense alternatives.
(d) Specific aqueous film-forming foam retrofit projects
that have been submitted under an application with state or
local firefighting authorities.
(6) The department shall:
(a) Adopt rules for containment, collection, and disposal
of aqueous film-forming foam.
(b) Maintain a registry of firefighting foam alternatives
that do not contain perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances.
(c) Provide technical assistance and grants for transition
to products that do not contain perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances.
(7) The department may administer grants or cost share
programs to assist local fire departments and airports in
transitioning to products that do not contain perfluoroalkyl and
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1019 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1019, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
polyfluoroalkyl substances.
(8) A person who violates this act is subject to:
(a) Civil penalties not to exceed $10,000 for each
violation for each day the violation persists.
(b) Additional penalties for failure to report inventories
or submit disposal plans.
(c) The department may seek injunctive relief to enforce
compliance with this section.
Section 3. Subsection (12) is added to section 403.086,
Florida Statutes, to read:
403.086 Sewage disposal facilities; advanced and secondary
waste treatment.—
(12)(a) All public entities disposing of domestic
wastewater biosolids and treated effluent that have a designed
average daily flow of 25,000 or more gallons per day must
quarterly conduct at least one biosolids and treated effluent
sampling, as applicable, for perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances, including perfluorooctanoic acid and perfluorooctane
sulfonate, and submit the results to the department. The
sampling must be conducted in accordance with department rules.
(b) Until water quality standards for perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances are established by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency and adopted by the department,
the sampling and reporting conducted pursuant to paragraph (a)
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1019 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1019, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
100 is for informational purposes only and may not be the basis for
101 any department enforcement action or other cause of action.
102 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1019 -03-er